Missouri, session 2026, HB2231.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 631, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 631.180, to read as follows:
631.180. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Dual diagnosis treatment", treatment for both:
(a) Substance use disorders; and
(b) Mental disorders or mental illnesses;
(2) "Dual diagnosis treatment center", any facility that holds itself out to the
public as providing dual diagnosis treatment;
(3) "Medication management", the ongoing monitoring and adjustment of
medication prescribed for substance use disorders and mental disorders or mental
illnesses including, but not limited to:
(a) Assessing the effectiveness of the medication;
(b) Monitoring for side effects and interactions;
(c) Adjusting dosages as needed; and
(d) Ensuring patient adherence to medication regimens;
(4) "Mental disorder", the same meaning given to the term in section 630.005;
(5) "Mental illness", the same meaning given to the term in section 630.005;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2231 2
(6) "Substance use disorder", a condition characterized by a pattern of
substance use leading to clinically significant impairment or distress, as defined in the
most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (DSM).
2. Every dual diagnosis treatment center operating in this state shall actively
manage medications prescribed for each of its patients to ensure medication compliance.
This requirement shall include, at a minimum, the following activities:
(1) Establishing a system for tracking medication prescriptions and refills;
(2) Conducting regular medication reviews with patients to assess effectiveness,
side effects, and adherence;
(3) Providing education and support to patients regarding their medications;
(4) Collaborating with pharmacists and other health care providers to ensure
safe and effective medication management; and
(5) Maintaining accurate records of medication management activities.
3. Dual diagnosis treatment centers shall adhere to the following treatment
standards:
(1) Treatment plans shall be developed and implemented in a way that addresses
both substance use disorders and mental disorders or mental illnesses in an integrated
manner;
(2) Treatment approaches shall be based on evidence-based practices that have
been demonstrated to be effective for dual diagnosis populations;
(3) Treatment plans shall be individualized to meet the unique needs of each
patient; and
(4) Treatment shall be provided in a patient-centered manner, with a focus on
patient autonomy and shared decision-making.
4. A facility shall not advertise or hold itself out to the public as providing dual
diagnosis treatment unless the facility meets the requirements of this section for dual
diagnosis treatment centers. Advertising and marketing materials of a dual diagnosis
treatment center shall accurately reflect the services offered by the facility and shall not
make false or misleading claims. A dual diagnosis treatment center shall clearly disclose
its licensure status and any relevant accreditation or certification in its advertising and
marketing materials.
5. The department of mental health shall enforce the provisions of this section.
A violation of any of the requirements of this section by a facility licensed under sections
630.705 to 630.760 shall be deemed a violation of sections 630.705 to 630.760, and any

HB 2231 3
facility violating such requirements shall be subject to all penalties, remedies, and
procedures provided in sections 630.705 to 630.760.
✔